Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 57
AGRICULTURAL AND LIVESTOCK ASSOCIATIONS

7-57-101 to 7-57-106. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article repealed, p. 543, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

(1) This article was numbered as article 4 of chapter 30, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1996, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

(2) Section 7-56-901 (2) of the "Colorado Cooperative Act" provides that cooperatives organized under this article prior to its repeal on July 1, 1996, shall be deemed to be organized under article 55 of this title until the cooperative elects to be governed by the "Colorado Cooperative Act", article 56 of this title.